Utah statutes.
31A-29-115.   Cancellation -- Notice.

(1) (a)  On the date of renewal, the pool may cancel an enrollee's policy if:

(i)  the enrollee's health condition does not meet the criteria established in Subsection 31A-29-111(5);

(ii)  the pool has provided written notice to the enrollee's last-known address no less than 60 days before cancellation; and

(iii)  at least one individual carrier has not reached the individual enrollment cap established in Section 31A-30-110.

(b)  The pool shall issue a certificate of insurability to an enrollee whose policy is cancelled under Subsection (1)(a) for coverage under Subsection 31A-30-108(3) if the requirements of Subsection 31A-29-111(5) are met.

(2)  The pool may cancel an enrollee's policy at any time if:

(a)  the pool has provided written notice to the enrollee's last-known address no less than 15 days before cancellation; and

(b) (i)  the enrollee establishes a residency outside of Utah for three consecutive months;

(ii)  there is nonpayment of premiums; or

(iii)  the pool determines that the enrollee does not meet the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 31A-29-111, in which case:

(A)   the policy may be retroactively terminated for the period of time in which the enrollee was not eligible;

(B)  retroactive termination may not exceed three years; and

(C)  the board's remedy under this Subsection (2)(b) shall be a cause of action against the enrollee for benefits paid during the period of ineligibility in accordance with Subsection 31A-29-119(3).

